Arkansas, session 2025, HB1850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1802(a), concerning the minimum
allowable reimbursement for ground ambulance services, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) The minimum allowable reimbursement rate under any health
benefit plan issued by a healthcare insurer to a participating ground
ambulance service provider or an out-of-network ground ambulance service
provider shall be at the rates approved or contracted between an the
ambulance service provider and a the local government entity as provided for
in § 14-266-105.
(2) In On and after July 1, 2025, in the absence of rates set as
provided under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the minimum allowable rate
of reimbursement under a health benefit plan issued by a healthcare insurer
shall be the lesser of:
*ANS341*
03/19/2025 11:49:37 AM ANS341

HB1850
(A) The rate established by the Workers' Compensation
Commission under its medical fee schedule for ambulance services Three
hundred twenty-five percent (325%) of the Medicare Ambulance Fee Schedule,
Arkansas Rural Rate, as established by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid
Services at the time of the date of service for the same service provided; or
(B) The provider's billed charges.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is necessary to resolve a
conflict regarding in-network and out-of-network reimbursement rates for
ambulance services; that the conflict is causing confusion between ambulance
providers, insurers, and the State Insurance Department; and that this act is
immediately necessary because to alleviate confusion concerning reimbursement
rates for ambulance services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.














03/19/2025 11:49:37 AM ANS341